Hawaii statutes.
[§612-25] Protection of jurors' employment.
(a) An employer shall not deprive an employee of the employee's employment, or
threaten or otherwise coerce the employee with respect thereto, because the
employee receives a summons, responds thereto, serves as a juror, or attends
court for prospective jury service.

(b) Any employer who violates subsection (a)
is guilty of a petty misdemeanor.

(c) If an employer discharges an employee in
violation of subsection (a) the employee within ninety days from the date of
discharge may bring a civil action for recovery of wages lost as a result of
the violation and for an order requiring the reinstatement of the employee.
Damages recoverable shall not exceed lost wages for six weeks. If the employee
prevails, the employee shall be allowed a reasonable attorney's fee fixed by
the court. [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next